Mississippi, session 2026, SB3163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 27-31-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-31-1.  The following shall be exempt from taxation: (a)  All cemeteries used exclusively for burial purposes. (b)  All property, real or personal, belonging to the State of Mississippi or any of its political subdivisions, except property of a municipality not being used for a proper municipal purpose and located outside the county or counties in which such municipality is located.  A proper municipal purpose within the meaning of this section shall be any authorized governmental or corporate function of a municipality. (c)  All property, real or personal, owned by units of the Mississippi National Guard, or title to which is vested in trustees for the benefit of any unit of the Mississippi National Guard; provided such property is used exclusively for such unit, or for public purposes, and not for profit. (d)  All property, real or personal, belonging to any religious society, or ecclesiastical body, or any congregation thereof, or to any charitable society, or to any historical or patriotic association or society, or to any garden or pilgrimage club or association and used exclusively for such society or association and not for profit; not exceeding, however, the amount of land which such association or society may own as provided in Section 79-11-33.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any foundation organized as a nonprofit corporation that is exempt from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that receives, invests and administers private support for a state-supported institution of higher learning, a public community college or junior college located in the State of Mississippi or a nonprofit private university or college located in the State of Mississippi, as the case may be. For the sole purpose of applying the preceding sentence, all property, real or personal, belonging to an entity that is wholly owned by and controlled by such a foundation shall be treated as belonging to the foundation, provided such property is not leased or otherwise used to generate revenue that is not used exclusively to benefit an institution described above.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any rural waterworks system or rural sewage disposal system incorporated under the provisions of Section 79-11-1.  All property, real or personal, belonging to any college or institution for the education of youths, used directly and exclusively for such purposes, provided that no such college or institution for the education of youths shall have exempt from taxation more than six hundred forty (640) acres of land; provided, however, this exemption shall not apply to commercial schools and colleges or trade institutions or schools where the profits of same inure to individuals, associations or corporations.  All property, real or personal, belonging to an individual, institution or corporation and used for the operation of a grammar school, junior high school, high school or military school.  All property, real or personal, owned and occupied by a fraternal and benevolent organization, when used by such organization, and from which no rentals or other profits accrue to the organization, but any part rented or from which revenue is received shall be taxed. (e)  All property, real or personal, held and occupied by trustees of public schools, and school lands of the respective townships for the use of public schools, and all property kept in storage for the convenience and benefit of the State of Mississippi in warehouses owned or leased by the State of Mississippi, wherein said property is to be sold by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue. (f)  All property, real or personal, whether belonging to religious or charitable or benevolent organizations, which is used for hospital purposes, and nurses' homes where a part thereof, and which maintain one or more charity wards that are for charity patients, and where all the income from said hospitals and nurses' homes is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit.  All property, real or personal, belonging to a federally qualified health center where all the income from such center is used entirely for the purposes thereof and no part of the same for profit. (g)  The wearing apparel of every person; and also jewelry and watches kept by the owner for personal use to the extent of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) in value for each owner. (h)  Provisions on hand for family consumption. (i)  All farm products grown in this state for a period of two (2) years after they are harvested, when in the possession of or the title to which is in the producer, except the tax of one-fifth of one percent (1/5 of 1%) per pound on lint cotton now levied by the Board of Commissioners of the Mississippi Levee District; and lint cotton for five (5) years, and cottonseed, soybeans, oats, rice and wheat for one (1) year regardless of ownership. (j)  All guns and pistols kept by the owner for private use. (k)  All poultry in the hands of the producer. (l)  Household furniture, including all articles kept in the home by the owner for his own personal or family use; but this shall not apply to hotels, rooming houses or rented or leased apartments. (m)  All cattle and oxen. (n)  All sheep, goats and hogs. (o)  All horses, mules and asses. (p)  Farming tools, implements and machinery, when used exclusively in the cultivation or harvesting of crops or timber. (q)  All property of agricultural and mechanical associations and fairs used for promoting their objects, and where no part of the proceeds is used for profit. (r)  The libraries of all persons. (s)  All pictures and works of art, not kept for or offered for sale as merchandise. (t)  The tools of any mechanic necessary for carrying on his trade. (u)  All state, county, municipal, levee, drainage and all school bonds or other governmental obligations, and all bonds and/or evidences of debts issued by any church or church organization in this state, and all notes and evidences of indebtedness which bear a rate of interest not greater than the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all money loaned at a rate of interest not exceeding the maximum rate per annum applicable under the law; and all stock in or bonds of foreign corporations or associations shall be exempt from all ad valorem taxes. (v)  All lands and other property situated or located between the Mississippi River and the levee shall be exempt from the payment of any and all road taxes levied or assessed under any road laws of this state. (w)  Any and all money on deposit in either national banks, state banks or trust companies, on open account, savings account or time deposit. (x)  All wagons, carts, drays, carriages and other horse-drawn vehicles, kept for the use of the owner. (y)  (i)  Boats, seines and fishing equipment used in fishing and shrimping operations and in the taking or catching of oysters. (ii)  All towboats, tugboats and barges documented under the laws of the United States, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (z)  (i)  All materials used in the construction and/or conversion of vessels in this state; (ii)  Vessels while under construction and/or conversion; (iii)  Vessels while in the possession of the manufacturer, builder or converter, for a period of twelve (12) months after completion of construction and/or conversion; however, the twelve-month limitation shall not apply to: 1.  Vessels used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals offshore outside the boundaries of this state; or 2.  Vessels that were used for the exploration for, or production of, oil, gas and other minerals that are converted to a new service for use outside the boundaries of this state; (iv)  1.  In order for a vessel described in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) to be exempt for a period of more than twelve (12) months, the vessel must: a.  Be operating or operable, generating or capable of generating its own power or connected to some other power source, and not removed from the service or use for which manufactured or to which converted; and b.  The manufacturer, builder, converter or other entity possessing the vessel must be in compliance with any lease or other agreement with any applicable port authority or other entity regarding the vessel and in compliance with all applicable tax laws of this state and applicable federal tax laws. 2.  A vessel exempt from taxation under subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph (z) may not be exempt for a period of more than three (3) years unless the board of supervisors of the county and/or governing authorities of the municipality, as the case may be, in which the vessel would otherwise be taxable adopts a resolution or ordinance authorizing the extension of the exemption and setting a maximum period for the exemption. (v)  As used in this paragraph (z), the term "vessel" includes ships, offshore drilling equipment, dry docks, boats and barges, except watercraft of every kind and character used in connection with gaming operations. (aa)  Sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of nuclear fuel and reprocessed, recycled or residual nuclear fuel by-products, fissionable or otherwise, used or to be used in generation of electricity by persons defined as public utilities in Section 77-3-3. (bb)  All growing nursery stock. (cc)  A semitrailer used in interstate commerce. (dd)  All property, real or personal, used exclusively for the housing of and provision of services to elderly persons, disabled persons, mentally impaired persons or as a nursing home, which is owned, operated and managed by a not-for-profit corporation, qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, whose membership or governing body is appointed or confirmed by a religious society or ecclesiastical body or any congregation thereof. (ee)  All vessels while in the hands of bona fide dealers as merchandise and which are not being operated upon the waters of this state shall be exempt from ad valorem taxes.  As used in this paragraph, the terms "vessel" and "waters of this state" shall have the meaning ascribed to such terms in Section 59-21-3. (ff)  All property, real or personal, owned by a nonprofit organization that:  (i) is qualified as tax exempt under Section 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; (ii) assists in the implementation of the national contingency plan or area contingency plan, and which is created in response to the requirements of Title IV, Subtitle B of the Oil Pollution Act of 1990, Public Law 101-380; (iii) engages primarily in programs to contain, clean up and otherwise mitigate spills of oil or other substances occurring in the United States coastal or tidal waters; and (iv) is used for the purposes of the organization. (gg)  If a municipality changes its boundaries so as to include within the boundaries of such municipality the project site of any project as defined in Section 57-75-5(f)(iv)1, Section 57-75-5(f)(xxi) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxviii) or Section 57-75-5(f)(xxix), all real and personal property located on the project site within the boundaries of such municipality that is owned by a business enterprise operating such project, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation for a period of time not to exceed thirty (30) years upon receiving approval for such exemption by the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Authority.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to authorize a breach of any agreement entered into pursuant to Section 21-1-59. (hh)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests (including, but not limited to, subleaseholds and subleasehold interests), of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of a facility for the manufacture, production, generation, transmission and/or distribution of electricity, and any real property related thereto, shall be exempt from ad valorem taxation during the period as the United States is both the title owner of the property and a sublessee of or with respect to the property; however, the exemption authorized by this paragraph (hh) shall not apply to any entity to whom the United States sub-subleases its interest in the property nor to any entity to whom the United States assigns its sublease interest in the property.  As used in this paragraph, the term "United States" includes an agency or instrumentality of the United States of America.  This paragraph (hh) shall apply to all assessments for ad valorem taxation for the 2003 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter. (ii)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, used by Mississippi nonprofit entities qualified, on or before January 1, 2005, under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to provide support and operate technology incubators for research and development start-up companies, telecommunication startup companies and/or other technology startup companies, utilizing technology spun-off from research and development activities of the public colleges and universities of this state, State of Mississippi governmental research or development activities resulting therefrom located within the State of Mississippi. (jj)  All property, real, personal or mixed, including fixtures and leaseholds, of start-up companies (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section) for the period of time, not to exceed five (5) years, that the startup company remains a tenant of a technology incubator (as described in paragraph (ii) of this section). (kk)  All leases, lease contracts or lease agreements (including, but not limited to, subleases, sublease contracts and sublease agreements), and leaseholds or leasehold interests, of or with respect to any and all property (real, personal or mixed) constituting all or any part of an auxiliary facility, and any real property related thereto, constructed or renovated pursuant to Section 37-101-41. (ll)  Equipment brought into the state temporarily for use during a disaster response period as provided in Sections 27-113-1 through 27-113-9 and subsequently removed from the state on or before the end of the disaster response period as defined in Section 27-113-5. (mm)  For any lease or contractual arrangement to which the Department of Finance and Administration and a nonprofit corporation are a party to as provided in Section 39-25-1(5), the nonprofit corporation shall, along with the possessory and leasehold interests and/or real and personal property of the corporation, be exempt from all ad valorem taxation, including, but not limited to, school, city and county ad valorem taxes, for the term or period of time stated in the lease or contractual arrangement. (nn) All property, real or personal, that is owned, operated and managed by a not-for-profit corporation qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, and used to provide, free of charge, (i) a practice facility for a public school district swim team, and (ii) a facility for another not-for-profit organization as defined under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code to conduct water safety and lifeguard training programs.  This section shall not apply to real or personal property owned by a country club, tennis club with a pool, or any club requiring stock ownership for membership. (oo)  Any all-terrain vehicle, as defined in Section 63-21-5, when held by a retailer on a consignment or floor plan basis. (pp) The entire assessed value of commodities, raw materials, works-in-process, products, goods, wares and merchandise held for resale by a manufacturer, distributor, wholesale or retail merchant.  For purposes of this paragraph (pp), assessed value may be determined by physical count or book value, at the option of the manufacturer, distributor, wholesale or retail merchant. (qq) The entire assessed value of eligible personal property owned by a business enterprise and used by the business enterprise solely on the premises of the business enterprise in the operation of the enterprise.  For purposes of this paragraph (qq), "eligible personal property" means furniture, fixtures or equipment classified as personal property for purposes of ad valorem taxation.  However, "eligible personal property" does not include (i) motor vehicles, or (ii) personal property included in Class IV property as defined in Section 112, Mississippi Constitution of 1890. SECTION 2.  It is the intent of the Legislature that any loss of revenue incurred by a county, municipality, or school district resulting from the elimination of the inventory tax in Section 27-31-1(pp) and (qq) be reimbursed to the respective local government entity through legislative appropriation.  Tax assessors shall continue to assess the value of the items exempted under Section 27-31-1(pp) and (qq) and shall apply the millage rate in effect to ascertain lost revenue for the year.  The amount of county, municipal and school district inventory tax that would have been levied shall be certified to the Department of Revenue at the same time the recapitulation of the assessment is transmitted to the department under Section 27-35-111.  The department shall compile the data and report it to the Legislature no later than November 1 of each year.  The Department of Revenue may promulgate rules and regulations to administer this section. SECTION 3.  Section 27-7-22.5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-7-22.5.  (1)  (a)  For any manufacturer, distributor, wholesale or retail merchant who pays to a county, municipality, school district, levee district or any other taxing authority of the state or a political subdivision thereof, ad valorem taxes imposed on commodities, raw materials, works-in-process, products, goods, wares and merchandise held for resale, a credit against the income taxes imposed under this chapter shall be allowed for the portion of the ad valorem taxes so paid in the amounts prescribed in subsection (2). (b)  (i)  For any person, firm or corporation who pays to a county, municipality, school district, levee district or any other taxing authority of the state or a political subdivision thereof, ad valorem taxes imposed on rental equipment, a credit against the income taxes imposed under this chapter shall be allowed for the portion of the ad valorem taxes so paid in the amounts prescribed in subsection (2). (ii)  As used in this paragraph, "rental equipment" means any rental equipment or other rental items which are held for short-term rental to the public: 1.  Under rental agreements with no specific term; 2.  Under at-will or open-ended agreements; or 3.  Under rental agreements with terms ordinarily of less than three hundred sixty-five (365) days; and 4.  Is not subject to privilege taxes imposed in Chapter 19, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. (c)  The tax credit allowed by this section may not be claimed by a taxpayer that is a medical cannabis establishment as defined in the Mississippi Medical Cannabis Act. (2)  The tax credit allowed by this section shall not exceed the amounts set forth in paragraphs (a) through (g) of this subsection; and may be claimed for each location where such commodities, raw material, works-in-process, products, goods, wares, merchandise and/or rental equipment are found and upon which the ad valorem taxes have been paid.  Any tax credit claimed under this section but not used in any taxable year may be carried forward for five (5) consecutive years from the close of the tax year in which the credit was earned. (a)  For the 1994 taxable year, the tax credit for each location of the taxpayer shall not exceed the lesser of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) or the amount of income taxes due the State of Mississippi that are attributable to such location. (b)  For the 1995 taxable year, the tax credit for each location of the taxpayer shall not exceed the lesser of Three Thousand Dollars ($3,000.00) or the amount of income taxes due the State of Mississippi that are attributable to such location. (c)  For the 1996 taxable year, the tax credit for each location of the taxpayer shall not exceed the lesser of Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) or the amount of income taxes due the State of Mississippi that are attributable to such location. (d)  For the 1997 taxable year and each taxable year thereafter through taxable year 2013, the tax credit for each location of the taxpayer shall not exceed the lesser of Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or the amount of income taxes due the State of Mississippi that are attributable to such location. (e)  For the 2014 taxable year, the tax credit for each location of the taxpayer shall not exceed the lesser of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or the amount of income taxes due the State of Mississippi that are attributable to such location. (f)  For the 2015 taxable year, the tax credit for each location of the taxpayer shall not exceed the lesser of Fifteen Thousand Dollars ($15,000.00) or the amount of income taxes due the State of Mississippi that are attributable to such location. (g)  For the 2016 taxable year and each taxable year thereafter, the tax credit of the taxpayer shall be the lesser of the amount of the ad valorem taxes described in subsection (1) paid or the amount of income taxes due the State of Mississippi that are attributable to such location. (3)  Any amount of ad valorem taxes paid by a taxpayer that is applied toward the tax credit allowed in this section may not be used as a deduction by the taxpayer for state income tax purposes.  In the case of a taxpayer that is a partnership, limited liability company or S corporation, the credit may be applied only to the tax attributable to partnership, limited liability company or S corporation income derived from the taxpayer. (4)  Any amount of ad valorem taxes applied and used as a tax credit under Section 27-31-19.1 may not be applied and used as a tax credit under this section. SECTION 4.  Section 27-35-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 27-35-15.  (1)  The tax assessors shall annually appraise all personal property subject to taxation in their respective counties at true value and assess it in proportion thereto. They shall set down in the assessment roll the names in full of all persons liable to taxation in the county in alphabetical order under each municipality, but firms or persons owning the same class of property may be listed on the roll together regardless of the alphabetical order.  Where there are on the roll more than one (1) person of the same name, the place of residence of each shall be shown, or they shall be otherwise so designated as to identify each and distinguish them.  The assessor shall set down each item of personal property liable to taxation and the amount of each individual's taxable property shall be totaled and set down in the column provided, opposite his name.  The assessor shall so fill out the blanks on the rolls as to disclose clearly and fully all information indicated by the roll. The tax assessor shall place in the columns provided on the roll the true value of the property owned by each taxpayer in every road district, school district, levee district or other special taxing district imposing an ad valorem tax; and he shall truly and correctly add every column on the roll and show in the proper column the total amount of property assessed to every taxpayer and the amount assessed to every taxpayer in each and every road district, school district or other special taxing district; and the totals of each column from every page shall be carried to the recapitulation on a page or pages in the back of the roll.  The tax assessor shall add the recapitulation and show the total amount of all property assessed in his county and the total for each municipality, school district, road district, levee district or other special taxing district imposing an ad valorem tax.  The assessor shall also show in his recapitulation the correct total of each and every column in the roll. (2)  The tax assessors shall include on the personal property roll the list of aircraft received from the State Tax Commission which are liable for registration but which have not been so registered as required by Title 61, Chapter 15, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after January 1, 2027.